District of Columbia statutes.
47-703

General system to be used — Daily transcript.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall cause to be made a daily transcript, and entry on the records of said Assessor, of the designations of lots or parcels of land in said District appearing in instruments of conveyance received for record in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds, and the designations of lots or parcels of land in said District transferred by probated wills; and the person or persons whom the Mayor of said District may designate for the purpose of making such transcript shall for this purpose at all times during office hours have full access to the records of the Recorder of Deeds and the Register of Wills of said District; and the Assessor shall daily furnish the Surveyor with a copy of such transcript.

History

Mar. 3, 1899, 30 Stat. 1377, ch. 457, § 3
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-703.
1973 Ed., § 47-403.

Editor's Notes

Office of Assessor abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-413.